Florida, session 2026, SB508.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 88 89 Section 1.âSection 373.1861, Florida Statutes, is created 90 to read: 91 373.1861âShort title.âSections 373.1861-373.1869 may be 92 cited as the âLandscape Irrigation Standards and Watering 93 Restrictions Act.â 94 Section 2.âSection 373.1862, Florida Statutes, is created 95 to read: 96 373.1862âLEGISLATIVE INTENT AND PURPOSE; APPLICABILITY.â 97 (1)âWhile an automatic landscape irrigation system is not 98 required, and a carefully designed landscape or a temporary 99 irrigation system may be considered for any property, it is the 100 intent and purpose of this act to: 101 (a)âImplement procedures that promote water conservation 102 through more efficient use of landscape irrigation to improve 103 environmental quality; and 104 (b)âEnsure efficient water use by establishing minimum 105 standards for landscape irrigation design which are considerate 106 of the climate, soil health, water resources, land use, and 107 resource planning of watershed districts in this state. 108 (2)âWater use in landscape irrigation systems may be 109 reduced by providing for all of the following: 110 (a)âThe preservation of existing vegetation. 111 (b)âThe use of site-appropriate plant materials. 112 (c)âThe use of pervious paving materials. 113 (d)âThe use of water-efficient landscape irrigation. 114 (e)âThe use of applicable best management practices. 115 (f)âThe use of environmentally sensitive site development 116 concepts. 117 (3)âThis act applies to new commercial landscapes, 118 residential landscapes, institutional developments proposing to 119 install a landscape irrigation system, and any substantial 120 improvement or modification to an existing landscape irrigation 121 system which requires 50 percent or more of the irrigation 122 system to be replaced or altered. 123 (4)âThis act does not apply to irrigation systems for any 124 of the following: 125 (a)âAgricultural production systems. 126 (b)âGreenhouses. 127 (c)âNurseries. 128 (d)âCemeteries. 129 (e)âGolf courses. 130 (f)âAthletic fields, playgrounds, or intensive recreational 131 areas. 132 (g)âVegetable gardens, fruit tree groves, or nut tree 133 groves. 134 Section 3.âSection 373.1863, Florida Statutes, is created 135 to read: 136 373.1863âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this act, the term: 137 (1)ââAddressâ means the house number of a physical location 138 of a specific property. This includes rural route numbers but 139 excludes post office box numbers. If a lot number in a mobile 140 home park or similar community is used by the United States 141 Postal Service to determine a delivery location, the lot number 142 is the propertyâs address. An even-numbered address means an 143 address ending in the numbers 0, 2, 4, 6, or 8 or the letters A 144 M. An odd-numbered address means an address ending in the 145 numbers 1, 3, 5, 7, or 9 or the letters N-Z. 146 (2)ââApplication rateâ or âprecipitation rateâ means the 147 rate at which water is applied to a given area by sprinklers or 148 emitters, usually expressed as depth per unit of time. 149 (3)ââAutomatic irrigation controllerâ means a device that 150 automatically turns an irrigation system, such as a lawn 151 sprinkler or drip irrigation system, on and off and is also 152 known as a clock or timer. 153 (4)ââBubblerâ means an emission device that applies water 154 to the soil, discharging at least 0.5 to 2 gallons of water per 155 hour, but generally less than 60 gallons per hour. 156 (5)ââBubbler irrigationâ means the application of water to 157 the soil surface at the plant root zone, discharging at least 158 0.5 to 2 gallons of water per hour, but generally less than 60 159 gallons per hour. 160 (6)ââCheck valveâ means a device that permits water to flow 161 in one direction and is installed on any sprinkler where low 162 point drainage occurs or if the sprinkler is located lower than 163 the valve box. 164 (7)ââControllerâ means a timing mechanism that signals 165 automatic valves to open and close on a pre-set program or based 166 on sensor readings or its mounting box. 167 (8)ââCoverageâ means the way water is applied to an area. 168 (9)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Environmental 169 Protection or its successor agency. 170 (10)ââDesign pressureâ means the pressure at which the 171 irrigation system or its components are designed to operate as 172 measured at the pump discharge or, if there is no pump, at the 173 entrance to the system. 174 (11)ââDistribution patternâ means the water depth distance 175 relationship measured from a single emission device. 176 (12)ââDistribution uniformityâ means even application of 177 irrigation across a landscaped area, as expressed as a decimal 178 or percent value. 179 (13)ââDrip irrigationâ means the precise low-rate 180 application of water to the soil surface, beneath the soil 181 surface, or near the plant root zone around widely spaced plants 182 across a large area. Applications normally occur as small 183 streams or discrete continuous drops in the range of 0.5 to 2 184 gallons per hour. 185 (14)ââDrip line emitterâ means a tube that discharges water 186 from integrated and evenly spaced emitters, perforations, or a 187 porous wall. 188 (15)ââEmission deviceâ means a landscape irrigation system 189 component used to dispense irrigation water to the landscape at 190 a specific rate. 191 (16)ââEmitterâ means a device used to control irrigation 192 discharge from lateral pipes and a device used in micro 193 irrigation systems. 194 (17)ââEstablishmentâ means the process by which newly 195 planted vegetation becomes self-sustaining and rooted in its new 196 location. 197 (18)ââFlorida Water Starâ means a statewide certification 198 program, owned by the St. Johns River Water Management District, 199 for new and existing homes and commercial developments that meet 200 specific water-efficiency criteria for their respective 201 landscape and irrigation systems, as well as plumbing fixtures 202 and appliances. 203 (19)ââFlow rateâ means the measure of a volume of water 204 moving in a certain amount of time. 205 (20)ââHeadâ means the exterior case or shell of a sprinkler 206 incorporating a means of connecting to a piping system and 207 designed to provide above-ground or overhead irrigation. The 208 head may also be known as a rotor, a spray head, a mist head, or 209 an impact sprinkler when referring to the type of emission used 210 interchangeably with and in conjunction with a sprinkler. 211 (21)ââHead-to-head spacingâ means spacing sprinkler heads 212 so the distance between sprinklers is equal to the sprinkler 213 head-rated throw radius. 214 (22)ââHydrozoneâ means a distinct grouping of plants with 215 similar water and climatic requirements which may be irrigated 216 within a common zone to conserve water, improve efficiency, and 217 avoid overwatering and underwatering. 218 (23)ââIrrigationâ means the intentional application of 219 water by artificial means to sustain plant growth or optimize 220 production. 221 (24)ââIrrigation inspectorâ means a person responsible for 222 inspecting landscape irrigation systems and carrying out all of 223 the following duties: 224 (a)âMaking determinations regarding whether a landscape 225 irrigation system complies with all relevant requirements. 226 (b)âMaking determinations regarding whether the appropriate 227 backflow prevention device is installed. 228 (c)âProviding test results to the water purveyor. 229 (d)âInvestigating and issuing findings for all complaints 230 alleging deficiency of a landscape irrigation system. 231 (25)ââLandscapeâ means an area that is planted with ground 232 covers, shrubs, trees, turf, or similar plant materials. 233 (26)ââLandscape areaâ means the total site area less the 234 building footprint, impervious or paved surfaces, stormwater 235 control structures, or waterbodies. It includes any permeable 236 surface on a given lot or parcel which is covered with gardens, 237 landscape, mulch, or turfgrass. 238 (27)ââLandscape irrigationâ means the outside watering of 239 plants, such as shrubbery, trees, lawns, grass, ground covers, 240 plants, vines, gardens, and other such flora, which may be 241 situated in diverse locations, such as commercial and industrial 242 establishments, public and residential areas, public medians, or 243 rights-of-way. 244 (28)ââLandscape irrigation planâ means a printed or drawn 245 plan for irrigation on a property with scaled dimensions which 246 identifies: 247 (a)âExisting rights-of-way, easements, and other land 248 reservations; 249 (b)âThe water source that will be used for irrigation; and 250 (c)âIrrigation specifications that include all of the 251 following information: 252 1.âPipe location, type, and size. 253 2.âSprinkler head location, including spacing to adjacent 254 sprinkler heads and structures. 255 3.âLocation of soil moisture sensor probes, if applicable. 256 4.âLocation and area of irrigation zones. 257 5.âSprinkler head type and application rate. 258 6.âMicro-irrigation type and application rate. 259 7.âLocation of heads requiring check valves and their 260 respective valve sizes. 261 8.âAll relevant pressure regulations. 262 (29)ââLandscape irrigation systemâ means a system of 263 delivering water to an area where it is needed, but not normally 264 present in necessary volume. 265 (30)ââLateralâ means a water delivery pipeline that 266 supplies water from a manifold or header pipe downstream of a 267 control valve to irrigation emission devices. 268 (31)ââLow-volume irrigationâ means heads that emit less 269 than 0.5 gallons of water per minute. 270 (32)ââMicro-bubblerâ means a unit designed for micro 271 irrigation applications requiring higher flow and coverage than 272 a spot emitter or drip, but a lower amount of water than a 273 standard bubbler. 274 (33)ââMicro-irrigationâ means the application of small 275 quantities of water directly on or below the soil surface or 276 plant root zone, in discrete drops, thin streams, or miniature 277 sprays, through emitters placed along lateral water delivery 278 pipes. Micro-irrigation encompasses a number of methods or 279 concepts, including drip irrigation, micro-bubblers, micro 280 sprays, subsurface irrigation, or low-volume or trickle 281 irrigation. 282 (34)ââMicro-irrigation emission deviceâ means an emission 283 device intended to discharge water in the form of drops or a 284 continuous stream at rates less than 30 gallons of water per 285 hour or 113.5 liters per hour at the largest area of coverage 286 available for the nozzle series when operated at 30 pounds per 287 square inch, except during flushing. 288 (35)ââMicro-sprayâ means a micro-irrigation emission device 289 that uses small-diameter tubing and small orifice micro-spray 290 heads to limit water output and deliver water more directly to 291 the plant root zone by converting irrigation water pressure to 292 discharge water at a flow rate not exceeding 30 gallons per hour 293 or 113.5 liters per hour at the largest area of coverage 294 available for the nozzle series when operated at 30 pounds per 295 square inch. Micro-spraying includes the use of micro-bubblers, 296 micro-spinners, or micro-spray jets. 297 (36)ââNozzleâ means the discharge opening or orifice of an 298 emission device used to control the volume, distribution 299 pattern, or droplet size of water discharge. 300 (37)ââNozzle throw diameterâ means the entire measured 301 width of the throw of a sprinkler head. 302 (38)ââOperating pressureâ means the water pressure 303 necessary to operate an emission device. Operating pressure may 304 be described as any of the following: 305 (a)ââMaximum operating pressure,â meaning the highest 306 manufacturer-recommended pressure to ensure proper operation of 307 an emission device. 308 (b)ââMinimum operating pressure,â meaning the lowest 309 manufacturer-recommended pressure to ensure proper operation of 310 an emission device. 311 (c)ââRecommended operating pressure,â meaning the 312 manufacturerâs recommended pressure for operation of an emission 313 device. 314 (39)ââOperator/managerâ means a person or an entity 315 responsible for the management of an irrigation system. 316 (40)ââOrificeâ means an opening with a closed perimeter 317 through which water flows. 318 (41)ââPersonâ means any person, firm, partnership, 319 association, corporation, company, or organization. 320 (42)ââRadius of throwâ means the distance of throw for a 321 circular wetting pattern. 322 (43)ââReclaimed waterâ means water that has been treated in 323 municipal wastewater facilities, has received at least secondary 324 treatment and basic disinfection, and is safe to use for 325 irrigation and other permitted purposes. 326 (44)ââResidential landscape irrigationâ means the 327 irrigation of landscapes associated with any residential housing 328 unit having sanitary facilities and kitchen facilities designed 329 to accommodate one or more residents, including single-family 330 homes, multifamily housing units, and mobile homes. 331 (45)ââRiserâ means a threaded pipe to which sprinklers or 332 other emitters are attached for above-ground placement. 333 (46)ââRotor sprinklerâ means a sprinkler that applies water 334 in a pattern to a defined landscape area by means of one or more 335 rotating streams. 336 (47)ââSmart irrigation controllerâ means a device designed 337 to reduce outdoor water use by irrigating based on a plantâs 338 watering needs. There are two basic types: 339 (a)âWeather-based irrigation controllers, which use local 340 weather and landscape conditions to tailor watering schedules. 341 (b)âSoil moisture-based irrigation controllers, which 342 monitor moisture levels in the soil to prevent irrigation when 343 water is not needed. 344 (48)ââSpacingâ means the distance between sprinklers or 345 other emitters. 346 (49)ââSpray sprinklerâ means a sprinkler that steadily 347 applies water in a pattern to a defined landscape area. 348 (50)ââSprinklerâ means an emission device consisting of a 349 sprinkler body with one or more nozzles or orifices to convert 350 irrigation water pressure to high-velocity water discharge 351 through the atmosphere, discharging a minimum of 0.5 gallons per 352 minute or 1.9 liters per minute at the largest area of coverage 353 available for the nozzle series when operated at 30 pounds per 354 square inch or more with a full-circle wetting pattern. 355 (51)ââSprinkler bodyâ means the exterior case or shell of a 356 sprinkler incorporating a means of connection to the piping 357 system, designed to convey water to a nozzle or an orifice. The 358 term includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: 359 (a)ââRotor sprinkler body,â meaning a sprinkler body that 360 contains components to drive the rotation of the nozzle or 361 orifice during operation without an integral control valve. 362 (b)ââSpray sprinkler body,â meaning a sprinkler body that 363 does not contain components to drive the rotation of the nozzle 364 or orifice during operation without an integral control valve. 365 (c)ââValve-in-head sprinkler body,â meaning a sprinkler 366 body that contains an integral control valve. 367 (52)ââSubstantial improvement or modificationâ means any 368 reconstruction, rehabilitation, addition, or other modification 369 of a structure, the cost of which equals or exceeds 50 percent 370 of the market value of the structure before the start of 371 construction of the modification. The term includes structures 372 that have incurred substantial damage, regardless of the actual 373 repair work performed. The term does not include any of the 374 following: 375 (a)âAny project for improvement of a structure to correct 376 existing violations of state or local health, sanitary, or 377 safety code specifications which have been identified by the 378 local code enforcement official and which improvements are the 379 minimum necessary to assure safe living conditions. 380 (b)âAny alteration of a historic structure, provided that 381 the alteration will not preclude the structureâs continued 382 designation as a historic structure. 383 (53)ââSubsurface irrigationâ means a landscape irrigation 384 system equipped with water emitters and a delivery line 385 installed below the soil surface. Such system is designed to 386 distribute water to soils directly from under the surface to 387 prevent airborne drift and minimize runoff. 388 (54)ââSupplyâ means the origin or source of the water used 389 in an landscape irrigation system. 390 (55)ââTemporary establishment irrigationâ means the short 391 term use of irrigation for the establishment of new vegetation 392 which must be removed once the plants are established. 393 (56)ââThrowâ means the measured distance from the nozzle or 394 orifice of a sprinkler head to where the sprinkler deposits 395 water. 396 (57)ââTurfgrassâ means a groundcover surface of mowed 397 grass. 398 (58)ââValveâ means a device used to control the flow of 399 water within a landscape irrigation system. 400 (59)ââWeather-based irrigation controllerâ means a device 401 that uses climatic information to determine when the landscape 402 irrigation system operates by reducing or cancelling irrigation 403 in response to rainfalls, temperature, and other climatic 404 conditions. 405 (60)ââWetting areaâ means a wetting pattern created by an 406 emission device or multiple emission devices in a defined area. 407 Section 4.âSection 373.1864, Florida Statutes, is created 408 to read: 409 373.1864âLegislative findings; landscape irrigation system 410 permit; plan design.â 411 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the landscape irrigation 412 system permit application procedures in this section provide an 413 economical, efficient, and safe method of reviewing proposed 414 landscape irrigation system plans and specifications before 415 installation, by: 416 (a)âRequiring the evaluation of proposed plans for a 417 landscape irrigation system; and 418 (b)âEnsuring that, if approved, the landscape irrigation 419 system is installed, maintained, and operated in a manner 420 consistent with a comprehensive plan pursuant to ss. 163.3177 421 and 163.3178 and the health, safety, and general welfare of 422 residents. 423 (2)âA person may not install, maintain, alter, repair, 424 service, or inspect a landscape irrigation system, or consult on 425 these activities, unless the person is a licensed irrigation 426 contractor or the property owner. A local government or water 427 management district may adopt more stringent requirements for a 428 property owner who installs an irrigation system. Only a 429 licensed irrigation contractor may connect a landscape 430 irrigation system to a water supply. 431 (3)âTo obtain a landscape irrigation permit, a licensed 432 irrigation contractor must submit an application to the 433 appropriate local government or water management district which 434 contains all of the following information: 435 (a)âThe licensed irrigation contractorâs name, address, 436 phone number, and e-mail address. 437 (b)âThe landscape irrigation contractorâs license. 438 (c)âA landscape irrigation plan with design drawings that 439 identify all design elements, development materials, and 440 proposed installation methods. Commercial, industrial, 441 multifamily, and municipal buildings must meet any additional 442 requirements provided in Appendix F of the Plumbing Volume of 443 the Florida Building Code. 444 (d)âAn application fee paid to the appropriate local 445 government or water management district. 446 (4)âThe licensed irrigation contractor shall create 447 landscape irrigation plan design drawings that are clearly 448 legible at a reasonable scale, display the entire site to be 449 irrigated, and include all modifications. Such design drawings 450 must show that there will not be any drainage from any emission 451 device when the irrigation system is turned off. 452 (5)(a)âLandscape irrigation plans must provide 453 accommodations for smaller areas of sprinkler irrigation, 454 including irrigated turfgrass areas, irrigated landscape bed 455 areas, and unirrigated areas, to prevent direct spray onto 456 buildings, driveways, roadways, or other impervious hardscapes. 457 (b)âSuch irrigated areas less than 4 feet wide must be 458 irrigated with micro-irrigation or zone-appropriate spray heads. 459 (6)âThe licensed irrigation contractor must submit the 460 landscape irrigation system permit application and plan to the 461 appropriate local government or water management district before 462 building construction commences. 463 (7)âBefore a local government or water management district 464 may issue a landscape irrigation permit, the licensed irrigation 465 contractor must provide the local government or water management 466 district with all of the following: 467 (a)âA Letter of Certification of Design for a Landscape 468 Irrigation System developed by the department certifying the 469 design is consistent with the requirements of this section and 470 signed by a landscape irrigation system professional. 471 (b)âA Letter of Completion Certifying Compliance with 472 Design for a Landscape Irrigation System developed by the 473 department certifying installation is consistent with the design 474 and signed by a landscape irrigation system professional. 475 (c)âProof of certification by the Florida Water Star 476 certification program. 477 Section 5.âSection 373.1865, Florida Statutes, is created 478 to read: 479 373.1865âLandscape irrigation system requirements.â 480 (1)âPURPOSE.âThe Legislature finds that the purpose of 481 landscape irrigation system standards is to ensure that 482 irrigation systems are designed for maximum efficiency and 483 uniformity in the irrigation zone and that systems prioritize 484 all of the following: 485 (a)âProper installation. 486 (b)âAppropriate watering scheduling and run times 487 consistent with s. 373.1866. 488 (c)âRegular maintenance by qualified entities. 489 (d)âIrrigation for establishment, post-establishment 490 scheduling, and appropriate removal. 491 (2)âLANDSCAPE IRRIGATION SYSTEM REQUIREMENTS.â 492 (a)âA landscape irrigation system must be divided into 493 zones based on all of the following factors: 494 1.âAvailable flow rate. 495 2.âCultural use of the area. 496 3.âType of vegetation irrigated, such as native plants, 497 shrubs, or turfgrass. 498 4.âType of sprinklers, including sprinklers with matching 499 precipitation rates. 500 5.âSoil characteristics and slope. 501 6.âSun exposure. 502 (b)âSpray heads and rotors may not be mixed in the same 503 zone, and bubblers for trees must be in separate zones. 504 (c)âTurfgrass and landscape beds must be irrigated in 505 separate zones. 506 (d)âLandscape irrigation systems must be designed to use 507 the lowest quality water that is available, is feasible to use, 508 and has been evaluated as suitable. This includes reclaimed 509 water and stormwater. 510 (3)âSPRINKLER SPACING REQUIREMENTS.âLandscape irrigation 511 system sprinkler spacing must be designed and maintained in the 512 following manner: 513 (a)âSprinkler heads must be spaced at 50 percent of the 514 nozzle throw diameter from adjacent sprinkler heads in all 515 directions the nozzle throws. The respective local government 516 may allow a variance for areas where head-to-head spacing will 517 oversaturate the soil or lead to inefficient water use. 518 (b)âSprinklers must be spaced at least 12 inches from 519 buildings and 4 inches from impervious areas. 520 (c)âSprinkler heads for turfgrass areas must be designed 521 and maintained with: 522 1.âA minimum 6-inch-high sprinkler body for St. Augustine, 523 Zoysia, or Bahia grasses. 524 2.âA minimum 4-inch-high sprinkler body for Centipede, 525 Bermuda, or Seashore Paspalum grasses. 526 (d)âSprinkler inspections, conducted by an irrigation 527 inspector, must take place at least quarterly to avoid watering 528 of impervious surfaces. 529 (e)âRotors and sprays in turf areas must be spaced to 530 achieve head-to-head coverage. 531 (f)âAll sprinkler heads must be pressure-regulated at the 532 head or zone valve and set to manufacturer specifications. 533 (g)âLandscape irrigation system pipes must maintain a 534 maximum of 5 feet per second water flow velocity for landscape 535 irrigation system integrity. 536 (4)âLANDSCAPE IRRIGATION EQUIPMENT, CAPACITY, AND 537 ACCESSORIES.âLandscape irrigation systems must be equipped with 538 all of the following: 539 (a)âThe capacity to operate in the range of 30 to 40 pounds 540 per square inch at each spray head or 40 to 50 pounds per square 541 inch at each rotor. 542 (b)âFilter devices to ensure emitters maintain proper cast 543 and coverage. 544 (c)âAn irrigation controller or smart irrigation controller 545 that includes a weather-based irrigation controller. Such 546 controllers must have nonvolatile memory or battery backup 547 capacity that retains the irrigation schedule, set pursuant to 548 s. 373.1866, during and after power outages. 549 (5)âADDITIONAL REGULATIONS.â 550 (a)âHigh-volume irrigation areas may not exceed 60 percent 551 of the total area to be irrigated. Low-volume irrigation areas 552 may be used in lieu of any high-volume irrigation area. 553 (b)âIrrigation risers may not be installed. 554 (c)âThere must be a minimum of 4 inches between 555 distribution equipment, including sprinklers, pumps, valves, or 556 other components, and impervious surfaces. 557 (d)âLandscape irrigation systems must use micro-irrigation 558 in landscape beds if supplemental irrigation is needed. 559 Section 6.âSection 373.1866, Florida Statutes, is created 560 to read: 561 373.1866âLandscape irrigation watering schedule.â 562 (1)âSCHEDULE.â 563 (a)âWhen daylight saving time is in effect, landscape 564 irrigation may occur only in accordance with the following 565 irrigation schedule: 566 1.âResidential landscape irrigation at odd-numbered 567 addresses or properties with no address may occur only on 568 Wednesday or Saturday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 569 p.m. 570 2.âResidential landscape irrigation at even-numbered 571 addresses may occur only on Thursday or Sunday and may not occur 572 between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. 573 3.âNonresidential landscape irrigation may occur only on 574 Tuesday or Friday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. 575 4.âNo more than 0.75 inches of water may be applied per 576 irrigation zone on any day that irrigation occurs, and such 577 irrigation may not occur for more than 1 hour per irrigation 578 zone on any day that irrigation occurs. 579 (b)âWhen Eastern Standard Time is in effect, landscape 580 irrigation may occur only in accordance with the following 581 irrigation schedule: 582 1.âResidential landscape irrigation at odd-numbered 583 addresses or properties with no address may occur only on 584 Saturday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. 585 2.âResidential landscape irrigation at even-numbered 586 addresses may occur only on Sunday and may not occur between 10 587 a.m. and 4 p.m. 588 3.âNonresidential landscape irrigation may occur only on 589 Tuesday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. 590 4.âNo more than 0.75 inches of water may be applied per 591 irrigation zone on any day that irrigation occurs, and such 592 irrigation may not occur for more than 1 hour per irrigation 593 zone on any day that irrigation occurs. 594 (c)âWhen Central Standard Time is in effect, landscape 595 irrigation may occur only in accordance with the following 596 irrigation schedule: 597 1.âResidential landscape irrigation at odd-numbered 598 addresses or properties with no address may occur only on 599 Saturday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. 600 2.âResidential landscape irrigation at even-numbered 601 addresses may occur only on Sunday and may not occur between 10 602 a.m. and 4 p.m. 603 3.âNonresidential landscape irrigation may occur only on 604 Tuesday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. 605 4.âNo more than 0.75 inches of water may be applied per 606 irrigation zone on any day that irrigation occurs, and such 607 irrigation may not occur for more than 1 hour per irrigation 608 zone on any day that irrigation occurs. 609 (d)âLandscape irrigation watering may be limited to only 610 that which may be necessary to meet the landscapeâs needs. 611 (e)âThe owner of a new irrigation system must adopt the 612 watering schedule outlined in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) 613 within 60 days after such system is installed. The licensed 614 irrigation contractor who installed such irrigation system must 615 provide the property owner or user with all of the following 616 post-construction and maintenance system information: 617 1.âThe irrigation system plan design drawings. 618 2.âMaintenance activities and schedules. 619 3.âThe systemâs operational schedule. 620 4.âInstructions for adjusting the system. 621 5.âWater shut-off method. 622 6.âThe manufacturerâs operational guide for the controller. 623 (2)âVARIANCE FROM SPECIFIC DAY OF THE WEEK LIMITATIONS.â 624 (a)âA local government may grant a variance from the 625 specific landscape irrigation watering schedule set forth in 626 subsection (1) for any of the following reasons: 627 1.âStrict adherence to the watering schedule would lead to 628 unreasonable or unfair results in particular instances, provided 629 that the applicant demonstrates with particularity that 630 compliance with the schedule will result in a substantial 631 economic, health, or other hardship on the applicant requesting 632 the variance or those served by the applicant; or 633 2.âA contiguous property is divided into different zones, 634 such that each zone must be irrigated on different days than 635 other zones of the property. 636 (b)âA local government may not grant a variance to allow a 637 single zone to be irrigated more than 2 days per week during 638 daylight saving time or more than 1 day per week during Eastern 639 Standard Time or Central Standard Time. 640 (3)âEXCEPTIONS TO THE LANDSCAPE IRRIGATION WATERING 641 SCHEDULE.âLandscape irrigation is subject to the following 642 landscape irrigation watering schedule exceptions: 643 (a)âIrrigation using a micro-spray, micro-jet, drip, or 644 bubbler irrigation system is allowed at any time. 645 (b)âIrrigation of a new landscape is allowed at any time of 646 day on any day for the initial 30 days after installation and 647 every other day for the next 30 days, for a total of one 60-day 648 period, provided that the irrigation is limited to the minimum 649 amount necessary for such landscape establishment. 650 (c)âWatering-in of chemicals, including insecticides, 651 pesticides, fertilizers, fungicides, and herbicides, when 652 required by law or when recommended by the manufacturer or best 653 management practices, is allowed at any time of day on any day 654 within 24 hours after application. Watering-in of chemicals may 655 not exceed 0.25 inches of water per application, except as 656 otherwise required by law or recommended by the manufacturer or 657 best management practices. 658 (d)âIrrigation systems may be operated at any time of day 659 on any day for maintenance and repair purposes, not to exceed 20 660 minutes per hour per zone. 661 (e)âIrrigation using a handheld hose equipped with an 662 automatic shut-off nozzle is allowed at any time of day on any 663 day. 664 (f)âDischarge of water from a water-to-air air-conditioning 665 unit or other water-dependent cooling system is not restricted 666 by this section. 667 (g)âThe use of water from a reclaimed water system is 668 allowed at any time. For the purposes of this paragraph, a 669 reclaimed water system includes systems in which the primary 670 source is reclaimed water, which may or may not be supplemented 671 from another source during peak demand periods. 672 (h)âThe use of recycled water from wet detention treatment 673 ponds for irrigation is allowed at any time, provided the ponds 674 are not augmented from any ground or off-site surface water or 675 public supply sources. 676 (4)âADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS.â 677 (a)âA spray sprinkler body that is not specifically 678 excluded from the scope of the United States Environmental 679 Protection Agencyâs WaterSense Specification for Spray Sprinkler 680 Bodies, Version 1.0 program must include an integral pressure 681 regulator and must meet the water efficiency and performance 682 criteria of the program. 683 (b)âBeginning July 1, 2027, a person may not sell, offer 684 for sale, lease, or install for compensation a new spray 685 sprinkler body unless the product includes a mark, label, or tag 686 denoting that the product meets or exceeds water efficiency and 687 performance criteria described in paragraph (a). 688 Section 7.âSection 373.1867, Florida Statutes, is created 689 to read: 690 373.1867âEnforcement and penalties.â 691 (1)âA licensed irrigation contractor as defined in s. 692 489.105(3)(q) shall report landscape irrigation systems that are 693 not in compliance with this act to the irrigation inspector or 694 such personnel as designated by the respective local government. 695 (2)âThe department, in coordination with local governments, 696 shall authorize law enforcement personnel or other government 697 staff as the enforcement officials. 698 (a)1.âEach violation of s. 373.1865 or s. 373.1866 is 699 subject to the following fines or penalties: 700 a.âA written warning for a first violation. 701 b.âA $50 fine for a second violation. 702 c.âA fine not to exceed $500 for all subsequent violations. 703 2.âFunds generated by penalties imposed pursuant to 704 subparagraph 1. shall be used by the respective local government 705 for the administration and enforcement of this act and to 706 further water conservation activities. 707 (b)âRegular maintenance and replacement of worn or broken 708 components which interrupts or inhibits the operation of a 709 landscape irrigation system is not a violation of this act if 710 such repairs are conducted within a reasonable time. 711 (c)âEnforcement officials may not provide violators with 712 more than one written warning before assessing a fine. 713 (d)âThe appropriate local government may take any other 714 appropriate legal action, including, but not limited to, 715 injunctive action, to enforce this section. 716 Section 8.âSection 373.1868, Florida Statutes, is created 717 to read: 718 373.1868âSeverability; conflicting law, rules, or 719 regulations.â 720 (1)âIf any provision of this act or its application to any 721 person or circumstance is held to be invalid by a court of 722 competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other 723 provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect 724 without the invalid provision or application, and to this end 725 the provisions of this act are severable. 726 (2)âIt is unlawful for any governmental entity to adopt or 727 to attempt to enforce any law, rule, or regulation in conflict 728 with the provisions of this act. 729 Section 9.âSection 373.1869, Florida Statutes, is created 730 to read: 731 373.1869âRulemaking.âThe department may adopt rules to 732 implement this act. 733 Section 10.âSection 373.62, Florida Statutes, is amended to 734 read: 735 373.62âWater conservation; automatic sprinkler systems.â 736 (1)âA licensed irrigation contractor Any person who 737 purchases and installs an automatic landscape irrigation system 738 shall must properly install, maintain, and operate technology 739 that inhibits or interrupts operation of the system during 740 periods of sufficient moisture. 741 (2)âA licensed irrigation contractor who installs or 742 performs work on an automatic landscape irrigation system shall 743 must test for the correct operation of each inhibiting or 744 interrupting device or switch on that system. If such devices or 745 switches are not installed in the system or are not in proper 746 operating condition, the licensed irrigation contractor must 747 install new ones or repair the existing ones and confirm that 748 each device or switch is in proper operating condition before 749 completing other work on the system. 750 (3)âThe department shall create a model ordinance by 751 January 15, 2010, that may be adopted and enforced by local 752 governments. The ordinance must, at a minimum: 753 (a)âRequire licensed contractors to report automatic 754 landscape irrigation systems that are not in compliance with 755 this section to the appropriate authority. 756 (b)âProvide penalties for licensed contractors who do not 757 comply with this section. The minimum penalty must be $50 for a 758 first offense, $100 for a second offense, and $250 for a third 759 or subsequent offense. 760 761 Regular maintenance and replacement of worn or broken technology 762 which interrupts or inhibits the operation of an automatic 763 landscape irrigation system is not a violation of this section 764 if such repairs are conducted within a reasonable time. 765 (4)âLocal governments may adopt the model ordinance by 766 October 1, 2010. Local governments that impose requirements that 767 are more stringent than the model ordinance are exempt from 768 adopting the ordinance. 769 (5)âFunds generated by penalties imposed under the 770 ordinance shall be used by the local government for the 771 administration and enforcement of this section and to further 772 water conservation activities. 773 (6)âFor purposes of this section, a licensed irrigation 774 contractor includes an individual who holds a specific 775 irrigation contractorâs license issued by a county. 776 (4)(a)(7)(a)âThe Legislature recognizes that lawn and 777 landscape irrigation systems use a substantial amount of the 778 stateâs potable water. The Legislature finds that smart 779 irrigation systems that use soil moisture sensors with remote 780 monitoring and adjustment capabilities, if properly installed 781 and monitored, provide more efficient irrigation and save 782 substantially more water than conventional time-controlled 783 irrigation systems. This is because smart irrigation systems 784 apply water to lawns and plants only as necessary to maintain 785 required soil moisture, thus minimizing the overwatering or 786 unnecessary watering that occurs with conventional irrigation 787 systems. However, in order for this technology to optimize the 788 efficient application of water it cannot be subject to day or 789 days-of-the-week watering restrictions. The Legislature, 790 therefore, recognizes that enacting a statewide process to 791 provide an exemption from local water restriction ordinances 792 will accelerate the adoption of this water saving technology. 793 Further, a uniform exemption process will streamline variance 794 procedures and minimize delay in implementing such technology. 795 The longer it takes to approve soil moisture sensor control 796 systems, the more potable water is wasted. A uniform variance 797 process will allow state residents to maintain their property 798 and protect water resources while enjoying their landscapes. 799 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 800 1.ââMonitoring entityâ means a local government, community 801 development district created pursuant to chapter 190, a 802 homeownersâ association created pursuant to chapter 720, a 803 condominium association created pursuant to chapter 718, a 804 cooperative created pursuant to chapter 719, or a public or 805 private utility. 806 2.ââSoil moisture sensorâ means a soil-based device that 807 assesses the available plant soil moisture in order to minimize 808 the unnecessary use of water and optimize the effectiveness of 809 an irrigation system. 810 3.ââSoil moisture sensor control systemâ is the collective 811 term for an entire soil moisture sensor system that has remote 812 monitoring and adjustment capability. 813 (c)âA variance from day or days-of-the-week watering 814 schedules pursuant to s. 373.1866 restrictions, which includes 815 shall include the maximum soil set point for different soil 816 types within the monitoring entityâs jurisdiction, must shall be 817 granted by the applicable water management district for any 818 residential, commercial, or recreational user within a 819 monitoring entityâs jurisdiction having a soil moisture sensor 820 control system if the monitoring entity certifies that: 821 1.âEach soil moisture sensor control system installed 822 within its jurisdiction will have multiple soil sensors that 823 conform to different soil types and slopes in order to optimize 824 water use for each user, adjust irrigation schedules based on 825 soil moisture requirements, and be installed by a licensed 826 contractor in a manner that is consistent with the Field Guide 827 to Soil Moisture Sensor Use in Florida by the University of 828 Florida IFAS Extension Program for Resource Efficient 829 Communities. 830 2.âIt has the ability to monitor the status of each 831 individual userâs system and to remotely modify the system 832 settings for irrigation cycles and run times. 833 3.âIt will electronically post and update a list of active 834 users of soil moisture sensor control systems within its 835 jurisdiction on a monthly basis and provide Internet access to 836 such listing and the monitoring database to the water management 837 district and the local government. 838 4.âIt shall provide notice to a user of noncompliant 839 activity within 48 hours after such activity and, if the user 840 does not take corrective action within 48 hours after such 841 notice, it will remove the posted notice required in 842 subparagraph 5. and remove the user from the active users list 843 required by subparagraph 3. 844 5.âIt shall post a notice at each parcel that has installed 845 a compliant soil moisture sensor control system in plain view 846 from the nearest roadway stating: âIrrigating with Smart 847 Irrigation Controller,â with the address of the parcel, and 848 shall remove the notice if the user is no longer being monitored 849 by the monitoring entity. 850 (d)âUpon installation of a soil moisture sensor control 851 system, the licensed contractor shall certify to the monitoring 852 entity that subparagraphs (c)1. and (c)2. have been met. 853 1.âThe monitoring entity shall post the notice required by 854 subparagraph (c)5. on the userâs property and update the 855 Internet listing of users of active soil moisture sensor control 856 systems to include the new user. 857 2.âOn an annual basis a professional engineer licensed 858 under chapter 471 or a professional landscape architect licensed 859 under chapter 481 shall perform an annual maintenance review of 860 all soil moisture sensor control systems within the monitoring 861 entityâs jurisdiction and certify to the monitoring entity which 862 systems are properly operating and in compliance with paragraph 863 (c). The monitoring entity shall update its Internet listing of 864 users of active soil moisture sensor control systems based on 865 the certification. 866 (e)âFailure by the monitoring entity to ensure continual 867 compliance with the condition of this variance shall be cause 868 for the appropriate water management district to revoke the 869 variance upon proper notice to the monitoring entity. 870 (f)âThe variance provided in this subsection applies to day 871 or days-of-the-week schedules pursuant to s. 373.1866 watering 872 restrictions of the water management district as preempted by s. 873 373.217. All other applicable local government and water 874 management district restrictions related to irrigation, 875 including, but not limited to, a prohibition on irrigation and 876 time-of-day watering requirements and water shortage or 877 emergency orders issued pursuant to s. 373.246(2) and (7), 878 remain applicable to the soil moisture sensor control system 879 users within a monitoring entityâs jurisdiction. 880 (g)âThis subsection does not require a property owner to 881 install a soil moisture sensor control system. This subsection 882 also does not prohibit a property owner from installing soil 883 moisture sensors and seeking an individual variance from the 884 applicable water management district even if such property is 885 located within the jurisdiction of a monitoring entity that has 886 been granted a variance pursuant to paragraph (c). 887 Section 11.âSubsection (3) of section 489.105, Florida 888 Statutes, is amended to read: 889 489.105âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 890 (3)ââContractorâ means the person who is qualified for, and 891 is only responsible for, the project contracted for and means, 892 except as exempted in this part, the person who, for 893 compensation, undertakes to, submits a bid to, or does himself 894 or herself or by others construct, repair, alter, remodel, add 895 to, demolish, subtract from, or improve any building or 896 structure, including related improvements to real estate, for 897 others or for resale to others; and whose job scope is 898 substantially similar to the job scope described in one of the 899 paragraphs of this subsection. For the purposes of regulation 900 under this part, the term âdemolishâ applies only to demolition 901 of steel tanks more than 50 feet in height; towers more than 50 902 feet in height; other structures more than 50 feet in height; 903 and all buildings or residences. Contractors are subdivided into 904 two divisions, Division I, consisting of those contractors 905 defined in paragraphs (a)-(c), and Division II, consisting of 906 those contractors defined in paragraphs (d)-(r) (d)-(q): 907 (a)ââGeneral contractorâ means a contractor whose services 908 are unlimited as to the type of work which he or she may do, who 909 may contract for any activity requiring licensure under this 910 part, and who may perform any work requiring licensure under 911 this part, except as otherwise expressly provided in s. 489.113. 912 (b)ââBuilding contractorâ means a contractor whose services 913 are limited to construction of commercial buildings and single 914 dwelling or multiple-dwelling residential buildings, which do 915 not exceed three stories in height, and accessory use structures 916 in connection therewith or a contractor whose services are 917 limited to remodeling, repair, or improvement of any size 918 building if the services do not affect the structural members of 919 the building. 920 (c)ââResidential contractorâ means a contractor whose 921 services are limited to construction, remodeling, repair, or 922 improvement of one-family, two-family, or three-family 923 residences not exceeding two habitable stories above no more 924 than one uninhabitable story and accessory use structures in 925 connection therewith. 926 (d)ââSheet metal contractorâ means a contractor whose 927 services are unlimited in the sheet metal trade and who has the 928 experience, knowledge, and skill necessary for the manufacture, 929 fabrication, assembling, handling, erection, installation, 930 dismantling, conditioning, adjustment, insulation, alteration, 931 repair, servicing, or design, if not prohibited by law, of 932 ferrous or nonferrous metal work of U.S. No. 10 gauge or its 933 equivalent or lighter gauge and of other materials, including, 934 but not limited to, fiberglass, used in lieu thereof and of air 935 handling systems, including the setting of air-handling 936 equipment and reinforcement of same, the balancing of air 937 handling systems, and any duct cleaning and equipment sanitizing 938 that requires at least a partial disassembling of the system. 939 (e)ââRoofing contractorâ means a contractor whose services 940 are unlimited in the roofing trade and who has the experience, 941 knowledge, and skill to install, maintain, repair, alter, 942 extend, or design, if not prohibited by law, and use materials 943 and items used in the installation, maintenance, extension, and 944 alteration of all kinds of roofing, waterproofing, and coating, 945 except when coating is not represented to protect, repair, 946 waterproof, stop leaks, or extend the life of the roof. The 947 scope of work of a roofing contractor also includes all of the 948 following and any related work: skylights; required roof-deck 949 attachments; any repair or replacement of wood roof sheathing or 950 fascia as needed during roof repair or replacement; and the 951 evaluation and enhancement of roof-to-wall connections for 952 structures with wood roof decking as described in Section 706 of 953 the Florida Building Code-Existing Building, provided that any 954 enhancement, which was properly installed and inspected in 955 accordance with the Office of Insurance Regulation uniform 956 mitigation verification inspection form, the Florida Building 957 Code, or project specific engineering that exceeds these 958 requirements, is done in conjunction with a roof covering 959 replacement or repair. 960 (f)ââClass A air-conditioning contractorâ means a 961 contractor whose services are unlimited in the execution of 962 contracts requiring the experience, knowledge, and skill to 963 install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or design, 964 if not prohibited by law, central air-conditioning, 965 refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, including duct 966 work in connection with a complete system if such duct work is 967 performed by the contractor as necessary to complete an air 968 distribution system, boiler and unfired pressure vessel systems, 969 and all appurtenances, apparatus, or equipment used in 970 connection therewith, and any duct cleaning and equipment 971 sanitizing that requires at least a partial disassembling of the 972 system; to install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, 973 or design, if not prohibited by law, piping, insulation of 974 pipes, vessels and ducts, pressure and process piping, and 975 pneumatic control piping; to replace, disconnect, or reconnect 976 power wiring on the line or load side of the dedicated existing 977 electrical disconnect switch on single phase electrical systems; 978 to repair or replace power wiring, disconnects, breakers, or 979 fuses for dedicated HVAC circuits with proper use of a circuit 980 breaker lock; to install, disconnect, and reconnect low voltage 981 heating, ventilating, and air-conditioning control wiring; and 982 to install a condensate drain from an air-conditioning unit to 983 an existing safe waste or other approved disposal other than a 984 direct connection to a sanitary system. The scope of work for 985 such contractor also includes any excavation work incidental 986 thereto, but does not include any work such as liquefied 987 petroleum or natural gas fuel lines within buildings, except for 988 disconnecting or reconnecting changeouts of liquefied petroleum 989 or natural gas appliances within buildings; potable water lines 990 or connections thereto; sanitary sewer lines; swimming pool 991 piping and filters; or electrical power wiring. A Class A air 992 conditioning contractor may test and evaluate central air 993 conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, 994 including duct work; however, a mandatory licensing requirement 995 is not established for the performance of these specific 996 services. 997 (g)ââClass B air-conditioning contractorâ means a 998 contractor whose services are limited to 25 tons of cooling and 999 500,000 Btu of heating in any one system in the execution of 1000 contracts requiring the experience, knowledge, and skill to 1001 install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or design, 1002 if not prohibited by law, central air-conditioning, 1003 refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, including duct 1004 work in connection with a complete system only to the extent 1005 such duct work is performed by the contractor as necessary to 1006 complete an air-distribution system being installed under this 1007 classification, and any duct cleaning and equipment sanitizing 1008 that requires at least a partial disassembling of the system; to 1009 install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or design, 1010 if not prohibited by law, piping and insulation of pipes, 1011 vessels, and ducts; to replace, disconnect, or reconnect power 1012 wiring on the line or load side of the dedicated existing 1013 electrical disconnect switch on single phase electrical systems; 1014 to repair or replace power wiring, disconnects, breakers, or 1015 fuses for dedicated HVAC circuits with proper use of a circuit 1016 breaker lock; to install, disconnect, and reconnect low voltage 1017 heating, ventilating, and air-conditioning control wiring; and 1018 to install a condensate drain from an air-conditioning unit to 1019 an existing safe waste or other approved disposal other than a 1020 direct connection to a sanitary system. The scope of work for 1021 such contractor also includes any excavation work incidental 1022 thereto, but does not include any work such as liquefied 1023 petroleum or natural gas fuel lines within buildings, except for 1024 disconnecting or reconnecting changeouts of liquefied petroleum 1025 or natural gas appliances within buildings; potable water lines 1026 or connections thereto; sanitary sewer lines; swimming pool 1027 piping and filters; or electrical power wiring. A Class B air 1028 conditioning contractor may test and evaluate central air 1029 conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, 1030 including duct work; however, a mandatory licensing requirement 1031 is not established for the performance of these specific 1032 services. 1033 (h)ââClass C air-conditioning contractorâ means a 1034 contractor whose business is limited to the servicing of air 1035 conditioning, heating, or refrigeration systems, including any 1036 duct cleaning and equipment sanitizing that requires at least a 1037 partial disassembling of the system, and whose certification or 1038 registration, issued pursuant to this part, was valid on October 1039 1, 1988. Only a person who was registered or certified as a 1040 Class C air-conditioning contractor as of October 1, 1988, shall 1041 be so registered or certified after October 1, 1988. However, 1042 the board shall continue to license and regulate those Class C 1043 air-conditioning contractors who held Class C licenses before 1044 October 1, 1988. 1045 (i)ââMechanical contractorâ means a contractor whose 1046 services are unlimited in the execution of contracts requiring 1047 the experience, knowledge, and skill to install, maintain, 1048 repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or design, if not prohibited 1049 by law, central air-conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and 1050 ventilating systems, including duct work in connection with a 1051 complete system if such duct work is performed by the contractor 1052 as necessary to complete an air-distribution system, boiler and 1053 unfired pressure vessel systems, lift station equipment and 1054 piping, and all appurtenances, apparatus, or equipment used in 1055 connection therewith, and any duct cleaning and equipment 1056 sanitizing that requires at least a partial disassembling of the 1057 system; to install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, 1058 or design, if not prohibited by law, piping, insulation of 1059 pipes, vessels and ducts, pressure and process piping, pneumatic 1060 control piping, gasoline tanks and pump installations and piping 1061 for same, standpipes, air piping, vacuum line piping, oxygen 1062 lines, nitrous oxide piping, ink and chemical lines, fuel 1063 transmission lines, liquefied petroleum gas lines within 1064 buildings, and natural gas fuel lines within buildings; to 1065 replace, disconnect, or reconnect power wiring on the line or 1066 load side of the dedicated existing electrical disconnect switch 1067 on single phase electrical systems; to repair or replace power 1068 wiring, disconnects, breakers, or fuses for dedicated HVAC 1069 circuits with proper use of a circuit breaker lock; to install, 1070 disconnect, and reconnect low voltage heating, ventilating, and 1071 air-conditioning control wiring; and to install a condensate 1072 drain from an air-conditioning unit to an existing safe waste or 1073 other approved disposal other than a direct connection to a 1074 sanitary system. The scope of work for such contractor also 1075 includes any excavation work incidental thereto, but does not 1076 include any work such as potable water lines or connections 1077 thereto, sanitary sewer lines, swimming pool piping and filters, 1078 or electrical power wiring. A mechanical contractor may test and 1079 evaluate central air-conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and 1080 ventilating systems, including duct work; however, a mandatory 1081 licensing requirement is not established for the performance of 1082 these specific services. 1083 (j)ââCommercial pool/spa contractorâ means a contractor 1084 whose scope of work involves, but is not limited to, the 1085 construction, repair, and servicing of any swimming pool, or hot 1086 tub or spa, whether public, private, or otherwise, regardless of 1087 use. The scope of work includes the installation, repair, or 1088 replacement of existing equipment, any cleaning or equipment 1089 sanitizing that requires at least a partial disassembling, 1090 excluding filter changes, and the installation of new pool/spa 1091 equipment, interior finishes, the installation of package pool 1092 heaters, the installation of all perimeter piping and filter 1093 piping, and the construction of equipment rooms or housing for 1094 pool/spa equipment, and also includes the scope of work of a 1095 swimming pool/spa servicing contractor. The scope of such work 1096 does not include direct connections to a sanitary sewer system 1097 or to potable water lines. The installation, construction, 1098 modification, or replacement of equipment permanently attached 1099 to and associated with the pool or spa for the purpose of water 1100 treatment or cleaning of the pool or spa requires licensure; 1101 however, the usage of such equipment for the purposes of water 1102 treatment or cleaning does not require licensure unless the 1103 usage involves construction, modification, or replacement of 1104 such equipment. Water treatment that does not require such 1105 equipment does not require a license. In addition, a license is 1106 not required for the cleaning of the pool or spa in a way that 1107 does not affect the structural integrity of the pool or spa or 1108 its associated equipment. 1109 (k)ââResidential pool/spa contractorâ means a contractor 1110 whose scope of work involves, but is not limited to, the 1111 construction, repair, and servicing of a residential swimming 1112 pool, or hot tub or spa, regardless of use. The scope of work 1113 includes the installation, repair, or replacement of existing 1114 equipment, any cleaning or equipment sanitizing that requires at 1115 least a partial disassembling, excluding filter changes, and the 1116 installation of new pool/spa equipment, interior finishes, the 1117 installation of package pool heaters, the installation of all 1118 perimeter piping and filter piping, and the construction of 1119 equipment rooms or housing for pool/spa equipment, and also 1120 includes the scope of work of a swimming pool/spa servicing 1121 contractor. The scope of such work does not include direct 1122 connections to a sanitary sewer system or to potable water 1123 lines. The installation, construction, modification, or 1124 replacement of equipment permanently attached to and associated 1125 with the pool or spa for the purpose of water treatment or 1126 cleaning of the pool or spa requires licensure; however, the 1127 usage of such equipment for the purposes of water treatment or 1128 cleaning does not require licensure unless the usage involves 1129 construction, modification, or replacement of such equipment. 1130 Water treatment that does not require such equipment does not 1131 require a license. In addition, a license is not required for 1132 the cleaning of the pool or spa in a way that does not affect 1133 the structural integrity of the pool or spa or its associated 1134 equipment. 1135 (l)ââSwimming pool/spa servicing contractorâ means a 1136 contractor whose scope of work involves, but is not limited to, 1137 the repair and servicing of a swimming pool, or hot tub or spa, 1138 whether public or private, or otherwise, regardless of use. The 1139 scope of work includes the repair or replacement of existing 1140 equipment, any cleaning or equipment sanitizing that requires at 1141 least a partial disassembling, excluding filter changes, and the 1142 installation of new pool/spa equipment, interior refinishing, 1143 the reinstallation or addition of pool heaters, the repair or 1144 replacement of all perimeter piping and filter piping, the 1145 repair of equipment rooms or housing for pool/spa equipment, and 1146 the substantial or complete draining of a swimming pool, or hot 1147 tub or spa, for the purpose of repair or renovation. The scope 1148 of such work does not include direct connections to a sanitary 1149 sewer system or to potable water lines. The installation, 1150 construction, modification, substantial or complete disassembly, 1151 or replacement of equipment permanently attached to and 1152 associated with the pool or spa for the purpose of water 1153 treatment or cleaning of the pool or spa requires licensure; 1154 however, the usage of such equipment for the purposes of water 1155 treatment or cleaning does not require licensure unless the 1156 usage involves construction, modification, substantial or 1157 complete disassembly, or replacement of such equipment. Water 1158 treatment that does not require such equipment does not require 1159 a license. In addition, a license is not required for the 1160 cleaning of the pool or spa in a way that does not affect the 1161 structural integrity of the pool or spa or its associated 1162 equipment. 1163 (m)ââPlumbing contractorâ means a contractor whose services 1164 are unlimited in the plumbing trade and includes contracting 1165 business consisting of the execution of contracts requiring the 1166 experience, financial means, knowledge, and skill to install, 1167 maintain, repair, alter, extend, or, if not prohibited by law, 1168 design plumbing. A plumbing contractor may install, maintain, 1169 repair, alter, extend, or, if not prohibited by law, design the 1170 following without obtaining an additional local regulatory 1171 license, certificate, or registration: sanitary drainage or 1172 storm drainage facilities, water and sewer plants and 1173 substations, venting systems, public or private water supply 1174 systems, septic tanks, drainage and supply wells, swimming pool 1175 piping, irrigation systems, and solar heating water systems and 1176 all appurtenances, apparatus, or equipment used in connection 1177 therewith, including boilers and pressure process piping and 1178 including the installation of water, natural gas, liquefied 1179 petroleum gas and related venting, and storm and sanitary sewer 1180 lines. The scope of work of the plumbing contractor also 1181 includes the design, if not prohibited by law, and installation, 1182 maintenance, repair, alteration, or extension of air-piping, 1183 vacuum line piping, oxygen line piping, nitrous oxide piping, 1184 and all related medical gas systems; fire line standpipes and 1185 fire sprinklers if authorized by law; ink and chemical lines; 1186 fuel oil and gasoline piping and tank and pump installation, 1187 except bulk storage plants; and pneumatic control piping 1188 systems, all in a manner that complies with all plans, 1189 specifications, codes, laws, and regulations applicable. The 1190 scope of work of the plumbing contractor applies to private 1191 property and public property, including any excavation work 1192 incidental thereto, and includes the work of the specialty 1193 plumbing contractor. Such contractor shall subcontract, with a 1194 qualified contractor in the field concerned, all other work 1195 incidental to the work but which is specified as being the work 1196 of a trade other than that of a plumbing contractor. This 1197 definition does not limit the scope of work of any specialty 1198 contractor certified pursuant to s. 489.113(6) and does not 1199 require certification or registration under this part as a 1200 category I liquefied petroleum gas dealer, or category V LP gas 1201 installer, as defined in s. 527.01, who is licensed under 1202 chapter 527 or an authorized employee of a public natural gas 1203 utility or of a private natural gas utility regulated by the 1204 Public Service Commission when disconnecting and reconnecting 1205 water lines in the servicing or replacement of an existing water 1206 heater. A plumbing contractor may perform drain cleaning and 1207 clearing and install or repair rainwater catchment systems; 1208 however, a mandatory licensing requirement is not established 1209 for the performance of these specific services. 1210 (n)ââUnderground utility and excavation contractorâ means a 1211 contractor whose services are limited to the construction, 1212 installation, and repair, on public or private property, whether 1213 accomplished through open excavations or through other means, 1214 including, but not limited to, directional drilling, auger 1215 boring, jacking and boring, trenchless technologies, wet and dry 1216 taps, grouting, and slip lining, of main sanitary sewer 1217 collection systems, main water distribution systems, storm sewer 1218 collection systems, and the continuation of utility lines from 1219 the main systems to a point of termination up to and including 1220 the meter location for the individual occupancy, sewer 1221 collection systems at property line on residential or single 1222 occupancy commercial properties, or on multioccupancy properties 1223 at manhole or wye lateral extended to an invert elevation as 1224 engineered to accommodate future building sewers, water 1225 distribution systems, or storm sewer collection systems at storm 1226 sewer structures. However, an underground utility and excavation 1227 contractor may install empty underground conduits in rights-of 1228 way, easements, platted rights-of-way in new site development, 1229 and sleeves for parking lot crossings no smaller than 2 inches 1230 in diameter if each conduit system installed is designed by a 1231 licensed professional engineer or an authorized employee of a 1232 municipality, county, or public utility and the installation of 1233 such conduit does not include installation of any conductor 1234 wiring or connection to an energized electrical system. An 1235 underground utility and excavation contractor may not install 1236 piping that is an integral part of a fire protection system as 1237 defined in s. 633.102 beginning at the point where the piping is 1238 used exclusively for such system. 1239 (o)ââSolar contractorâ means a contractor whose services 1240 consist of the installation, alteration, repair, maintenance, 1241 relocation, or replacement of solar panels for potable solar 1242 water heating systems, swimming pool solar heating systems, and 1243 photovoltaic systems and any appurtenances, apparatus, or 1244 equipment used in connection therewith, whether public, private, 1245 or otherwise, regardless of use. A contractor, certified or 1246 registered pursuant to this chapter, is not required to become a 1247 certified or registered solar contractor or to contract with a 1248 solar contractor in order to provide services enumerated in this 1249 paragraph that are within the scope of the services such 1250 contractors may render under this part. 1251 (p)ââPollutant storage systems contractorâ means a 1252 contractor whose services are limited to, and who has the 1253 experience, knowledge, and skill to install, maintain, repair, 1254 alter, extend, or design, if not prohibited by law, and use 1255 materials and items used in the installation, maintenance, 1256 extension, and alteration of, pollutant storage tanks. Any 1257 person installing a pollutant storage tank shall perform such 1258 installation in accordance with the standards adopted pursuant 1259 to s. 376.303. 1260 (q)ââIrrigation contractorâ means a contractor whose 1261 services are unlimited in the landscape irrigation trade and who 1262 possesses the experience, knowledge, and skill necessary to 1263 sell, install, design, consult, maintain, alter, repair, or 1264 service an irrigation system, including the connection of such 1265 system to a private or public water supply. This includes system 1266 connection to water wells in unincorporated areas. 1267 (r)(q)ââSpecialty contractorâ means a contractor whose 1268 scope of work and responsibility is limited to a particular 1269 phase of construction established in a category adopted by board 1270 rule and whose scope is limited to a subset of the activities 1271 described in one of the paragraphs of this subsection. 1272 Section 12.âSubsections (2) and (4) of section 489.107, 1273 Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (1) of that 1274 section is republished, to read: 1275 489.107âConstruction Industry Licensing Board.â 1276 (1)âTo carry out the provisions of this part, there is 1277 created within the department the Construction Industry 1278 Licensing Board. Members shall be appointed by the Governor, 1279 subject to confirmation by the Senate. Members shall be 1280 appointed for 4-year terms. A vacancy on the board shall be 1281 filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner 1282 as the original appointment. No member shall serve more than two 1283 consecutive 4-year terms or more than 11 years on the board. 1284 (2)âThe board shall consist of 19 18 members, of whom: 1285 (a)âFour are primarily engaged in business as general 1286 contractors; 1287 (b)âThree are primarily engaged in business as building 1288 contractors or residential contractors, however, at least one 1289 building contractor and one residential contractor shall be 1290 appointed; 1291 (c)âOne is primarily engaged in business as a roofing 1292 contractor; 1293 (d)âOne is primarily engaged in business as a sheet metal 1294 contractor; 1295 (e)âOne is primarily engaged in business as an air 1296 conditioning contractor; 1297 (f)âOne is primarily engaged in business as a mechanical 1298 contractor; 1299 (g)âOne is primarily engaged in business as a pool 1300 contractor; 1301 (h)âOne is primarily engaged in business as a plumbing 1302 contractor; 1303 (i)âOne is primarily engaged in business as an underground 1304 utility and excavation contractor; 1305 (j)âOne is primarily engaged in business as a landscape 1306 irrigation contractor; 1307 (k)(j)âTwo are consumer members who are not, and have never 1308 been, members or practitioners of a profession regulated by the 1309 board or members of any closely related profession; and 1310 (l)(k)âTwo are building officials of a municipality or 1311 county. 1312 (4)âThe board shall be divided into two divisions, Division 1313 I and Division II. 1314 (a)âDivision I consists is comprised of the general 1315 contractor, building contractor, and residential contractor 1316 members of the board; one of the members appointed pursuant to 1317 paragraph (2)(k) (2)(j); and one of the members appointed 1318 pursuant to paragraph (2)(l)(2)(k). Division I has jurisdiction 1319 over the regulation of general contractors, building 1320 contractors, and residential contractors. 1321 (b)âDivision II consists is comprised of the roofing 1322 contractor, sheet metal contractor, air-conditioning contractor, 1323 mechanical contractor, pool contractor, plumbing contractor, 1324 licensed irrigation contractor, and underground utility and 1325 excavation contractor members of the board; one of the members 1326 appointed pursuant to paragraph (2)(k) (2)(j); and one of the 1327 members appointed pursuant to paragraph (2)(l) (2)(k). Division 1328 II has jurisdiction over the regulation of contractors defined 1329 in s. 489.105(3)(d)-(q) s. 489.105(3)(d)-(p). 1330 (c)âJurisdiction for the regulation of specialty 1331 contractors defined in s. 489.105(3)(r) s. 489.105(3)(q) shall 1332 lie with the division having jurisdiction over the scope of work 1333 of the specialty contractor as defined by board rule. 1334 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 489.111, Florida 1335 Statutes, is amended to read: 1336 489.111âLicensure by examination.â 1337 (2)âA person shall be eligible for licensure by examination 1338 if the person: 1339 (a)âIs 18 years of age; 1340 (b)âIs of good moral character; and 1341 (c)âMeets eligibility requirements according to one of the 1342 following criteria: 1343 1.âHas received a baccalaureate degree from an accredited 1344 4-year college in the appropriate field of engineering, 1345 architecture, or building construction and has 1 year of proven 1346 experience in the category in which the person seeks to qualify. 1347 For the purpose of this part, a minimum of 2,000 person-hours 1348 shall be used in determining full-time equivalency. An applicant 1349 who is exempt from passing an examination under s. 489.113(1) is 1350 eligible for a license under this section. 1351 2.âHas a total of at least 4 years of active experience as 1352 a worker who has learned the trade by serving an apprenticeship 1353 as a skilled worker who is able to command the rate of a 1354 mechanic in the particular trade or as a foreman who is in 1355 charge of a group of workers and usually is responsible to a 1356 superintendent or a contractor or his or her equivalent; 1357 provided, however, that at least 1 year of active experience 1358 shall be as a foreman. 1359 3.âHas a combination of not less than 1 year of experience 1360 as a foreman and not less than 3 years of credits for any 1361 accredited college-level courses; has a combination of not less 1362 than 1 year of experience as a skilled worker, 1 year of 1363 experience as a foreman, and not less than 2 years of credits 1364 for any accredited college-level courses; or has a combination 1365 of not less than 2 years of experience as a skilled worker, 1 1366 year of experience as a foreman, and not less than 1 year of 1367 credits for any accredited college-level courses. All junior 1368 college or community college-level courses shall be considered 1369 accredited college-level courses. 1370 4.a.âAn active certified residential contractor is eligible 1371 to receive a certified building contractor license after passing 1372 or having previously passed the building contractorsâ 1373 examination if he or she possesses a minimum of 3 years of 1374 proven experience in the classification in which he or she is 1375 certified. 1376 b.âAn active certified residential contractor is eligible 1377 to receive a certified general contractor license after passing 1378 or having previously passed the general contractorsâ examination 1379 if he or she possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience 1380 in the classification in which he or she is certified. 1381 c.âAn active certified building contractor is eligible to 1382 receive a certified general contractor license after passing or 1383 having previously passed the general contractorsâ examination if 1384 he or she possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in 1385 the classification in which he or she is certified. 1386 5.a.âAn active certified air-conditioning Class C 1387 contractor is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning 1388 Class B contractor license after passing or having previously 1389 passed the air-conditioning Class B contractorsâ examination if 1390 he or she possesses a minimum of 3 years of proven experience in 1391 the classification in which he or she is certified. 1392 b.âAn active certified air-conditioning Class C contractor 1393 is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning Class A 1394 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the 1395 air-conditioning Class A contractorsâ examination if he or she 1396 possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in the 1397 classification in which he or she is certified. 1398 c.âAn active certified air-conditioning Class B contractor 1399 is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning Class A 1400 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the 1401 air-conditioning Class A contractorsâ examination if he or she 1402 possesses a minimum of 1 year of proven experience in the 1403 classification in which he or she is certified. 1404 6.a.âAn active certified swimming pool servicing contractor 1405 is eligible to receive a certified residential swimming pool 1406 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the 1407 residential swimming pool contractorsâ examination if he or she 1408 possesses a minimum of 3 years of proven experience in the 1409 classification in which he or she is certified. 1410 b.âAn active certified swimming pool servicing contractor 1411 is eligible to receive a certified commercial swimming pool 1412 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the 1413 swimming pool commercial contractorsâ examination if he or she 1414 possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in the 1415 classification in which he or she is certified. 1416 c.âAn active certified residential swimming pool contractor 1417 is eligible to receive a certified commercial swimming pool 1418 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the 1419 commercial swimming pool contractorsâ examination if he or she 1420 possesses a minimum of 1 year of proven experience in the 1421 classification in which he or she is certified. 1422 d.âAn applicant is eligible to receive a certified swimming 1423 pool/spa servicing contractor license after passing or having 1424 previously passed the swimming pool/spa servicing contractorsâ 1425 examination if he or she has satisfactorily completed 60 hours 1426 of instruction in courses related to the scope of work covered 1427 by that license and approved by the Construction Industry 1428 Licensing Board by rule and has at least 1 year of proven 1429 experience related to the scope of work of such a contractor. 1430 7.âAn applicant may submit an application to the department 1431 to take the irrigation contractorsâ examination after he or she 1432 satisfactorily completes 60 hours of instruction in courses 1433 related to the scope of work covered by that license and 1434 approved by the Construction Industry Licensing Board by rule. 1435 Section 14.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 1436 489.117, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1437 489.117âRegistration; specialty contractors.â 1438 (4)(a)1.âA person whose job scope does not substantially 1439 correspond to either the job scope of one of the contractor 1440 categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o), or the job scope of 1441 one of the certified specialty contractor categories established 1442 by board rule, is not required to register with the board. A 1443 local government, as defined in s. 163.211, may not require a 1444 person to obtain a license, issued by the local government or 1445 the state, for a job scope which does not substantially 1446 correspond to the job scope of one of the contractor categories 1447 defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) and (r) s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) and 1448 (q) or authorized in s. 489.1455(1), or the job scope of one of 1449 the certified specialty contractor categories established 1450 pursuant to s. 489.113(6). A local government may not require a 1451 state or local license to obtain a permit for such job scopes. 1452 For purposes of this section, job scopes for which a local 1453 government may not require a license include, but are not 1454 limited to, painting; flooring; cabinetry; interior remodeling 1455 when the scope of the project does not include a task for which 1456 a state license is required; driveway or tennis court 1457 installation; handyman services; decorative stone, tile, marble, 1458 granite, or terrazzo installation; plastering; pressure washing; 1459 stuccoing; caulking; and canvas awning and ornamental iron 1460 installation. 1461 2.âA county that includes an area designated as an area of 1462 critical state concern under s. 380.05 may offer a license for 1463 any job scope which requires a contractor license under this 1464 part if the county imposed such a licensing requirement before 1465 January 1, 2021. 1466 3.âA local government may continue to offer a license for 1467 veneer, including aluminum or vinyl gutters, siding, soffit, or 1468 fascia; rooftop painting, coating, and cleaning above three 1469 stories in height; or fence installation and erection if the 1470 local government imposed such a licensing requirement before 1471 January 1, 2021. 1472 4.âA local government may not require a license as a 1473 prerequisite to submit a bid for public works projects if the 1474 work to be performed does not require a license under general 1475 law. 1476 Section 15.âSubsection (1) of section 489.118, Florida 1477 Statutes, is amended to read: 1478 489.118âCertification of registered contractors; 1479 grandfathering provisions.âThe board shall, upon receipt of a 1480 completed application and appropriate fee, issue a certificate 1481 in the appropriate category to any contractor registered under 1482 this part who makes application to the board and can show that 1483 he or she meets each of the following requirements: 1484 (1)âCurrently holds a valid registered local license in one 1485 of the contractor categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(q) s. 1486 489.105(3)(a)-(p). 1487 Section 16.âSubsection (2) of section 489.141, Florida 1488 Statutes, is amended to read: 1489 489.141âConditions for recovery; eligibility.â 1490 (2)âA claimant is not qualified to make a claim for 1491 recovery from the recovery fund if: 1492 (a)âThe claimant is the spouse of the judgment debtor or 1493 licensee or a personal representative of such spouse; 1494 (b)âThe claimant is a licensee who acted as the contractor 1495 in the transaction that is the subject of the claim; 1496 (c)âThe claim is based upon a construction contract in 1497 which the licensee was acting with respect to the property owned 1498 or controlled by the licensee; 1499 (d)âThe claim is based upon a construction contract in 1500 which the contractor did not hold a valid and current license at 1501 the time of the construction contract; 1502 (e)âThe claimant was associated in a business relationship 1503 with the licensee other than the contract at issue; or 1504 (f)âThe claimant had entered into a contract with a 1505 licensee to perform a scope of work described in s. 1506 489.105(3)(d)-(r) s. 489.105(3)(d)-(q) before July 1, 2016. 1507 Section 17.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.